New Jersey, session 221, A3302.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    A permit issued pursuant to P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-1 et seq.) shall be required for: a.     A development located in the coastal area on any beach or dune; b.    A development located in the coastal area between the mean high water line of any tidal waters, or the landward limit of a beach or dune, whichever is most landward, and a point 150 feet landward of the mean high water line of any tidal waters or the landward limit of a beach or dune, whichever is most landward [, that would result, either solely or in conjunction with a previous development, in: (1)   A development if there is no intervening development with an above ground structure, excluding any shore protection structure or sand fencing, that is either completed or under active construction between the proposed site of the development and the mean high water line of any tidal waters; (2)   A residential development having three or more dwelling units if there is an intervening development with an above ground structure, excluding any shore protection structure or sand fencing, that is either completed or under active construction between the proposed site of the dwelling units and the mean high water line of any tidal waters; (3)   A commercial development having five or more parking spaces if there is an intervening development with an above ground structure, excluding any shore protection structure or sand fencing, that is either completed or under active construction between the proposed site of the commercial development and the mean high water line of any tidal waters; or (4)   A public development or industrial development] ; c.     [A development located in the coastal area between a point greater than 150 feet landward of the mean high water line of any tidal waters or the landward limit of a beach or dune, whichever is most landward, and a point 500 feet landward of the mean high water line of any tidal waters or the landward limit of a beach or dune, whichever is most landward, which is located within the boundaries of a municipality which meets the criteria of a "qualifying municipality" pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178), or which is located within the boundaries of a city of the fourth class with a population of over 30,000 persons according to the latest federal decennial census, that would result, either solely or in conjunction with a previous development, in: (1)   A residential development having 25 or more dwelling units; (2)   A commercial development having 50 or more parking spaces; or (3)   A public development or industrial development] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) ; d.    A development located in the coastal area at a point beyond 500 feet landward of the mean high water line of any tidal waters or the landward limit of a beach or dune, whichever is most landward, and which is located within the boundaries of a municipality which meets the criteria of a "qualifying municipality" pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178), or which is located within the boundaries of a city of the fourth class with a population of over 30,000 persons according to the latest federal decennial census, that would result, either solely or in conjunction with a previous development, in: (1)   A residential development having [75] 25 or more dwelling units; (2)   A commercial development having [150] 50 or more parking spaces; or (3)   A public development or industrial development; or e.     Except as otherwise provided in [subsection c. and] subsection d. of this section, a development in the coastal area at a point beyond 150 feet landward of the mean high water line of any tidal waters or the landward limit of a beach or dune, whichever is most landward, that would result, either solely or in conjunction with a previous development, in: (1)   A residential development having [25] three or more dwelling units; (2)   A commercial development having [50] five or more parking spaces; or (3)   A public development or industrial development. (cf:  P.L.1993, c.190, s.5) 2.    Section 7 of P.L.1993, c.190 (C.13:19-5.2) is amended to read as follows: 7.    A permit shall not be required pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-5) for: a.     A development which has received preliminary site plan approval pursuant to the "Municipal Land Use Law," P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-1 et seq.) or a final municipal building or construction permit on or prior to July 19, 1994, or a residential development which has received preliminary subdivision approval or minor subdivision approval on or prior to July 19, 1994 where no subsequent site plan approval is required, provided that, in any of the cases identified above, construction begins within three years of July 19, 1994, and continues to completion with no lapses in construction activity of more than one year.  This subsection shall not apply to any development that required a permit pursuant to P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-1 et seq.) prior to July 19, 1994; b.    [The reconstruction of any development that is damaged or destroyed, in whole or in part, by fire, storm, natural hazard or act of God, provided that such reconstruction is in compliance with existing requirements or codes of municipal, State and federal law] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) ; c.     The enlargement of any development if the enlargement does not result in: (1)   the enlargement of the footprint of the development; or (2)   an increase in the number of dwelling units within the development; d.    The construction of a patio, deck or similar structure at a residential development; e.    Services provided, within the existing public right-of-way, by any governmental entity which involve: (1)   the routine reconstruction, substantially similar functional replacement, or maintenance or repair of public highways; (2)   public highway lane widening, intersection and shoulder improvement projects which do not increase the number of travel lanes; or (3)   public highway signing, lighting, guiderail and other nonintrusive safety projects; f.     [The expansion of an existing, functional amusement pier, provided such expansion does not exceed the footprint of the existing, functional amusement pier by more than 25 percent, and provided the expansion is located in the area beyond 150 feet landward of the mean high water line, beach or dune, whichever is most landward] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) ; or g.    [The enclosure of an establishment offering dining, food services and beverages that was in operation as of December 18, 2000 and is located upon a functional pier, provided the enclosure only includes an open area which was actively used in the operation of the establishment] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) . A development subject to any exemption provided in this section shall be required to satisfy all other applicable requirements of law. (cf:  P.L.2001, c.418, s.1) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately, except that section 1 shall not apply to any application for a permit issued pursuant to P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-1 et seq.) deemed by the Department of Environmental Protection to be complete for review on or prior to the date of enactment of this act.